Indiana, session 2026, SB58.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-30-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 141, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each school corporation shall
include in the school corporation's curriculum the following studies:
(1) Language arts, including:
(A) English;
(B) grammar;
(C) composition;
(D) speech; and
(E) second languages;
(F) for an elementary school:
(i) print handwriting; and
(ii) cursive handwriting; and
(G) for kindergarten through grade 6, spelling.
(2) Mathematics.
(3) Social studies and citizenship, including the:
(A) constitutions;
2026 IN 58—LS 6163/DI 110


(B) governmental systems; and
(C) histories;
of Indiana and the United States, including an enhanced study of
the Holocaust in each high school United States history course.
As part of the United States government credit awarded for the
general, Core 40, Core 40 with academic honors, and Core 40
with technical honors designation, each high school shall
administer the naturalization examination provided by the United
States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(4) Sciences, including, after June 30, 2021, computer science.
(5) Fine arts, including music and art.
(6) Health education, physical fitness, safety, and the effects of
alcohol, tobacco, drugs, and other substances on the human body.
(7) Additional studies selected by each governing body, subject
to revision by the state board.
(b) Not later than November 1 each year, the department shall report
to the general assembly in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 the
following:
(1) The number of students who took the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a)(3).
(2) The number of students who passed the naturalization
examination described in subsection (a)(3) by a score of not less
than sixty percent (60%) on their first attempt.
(3) The pass rate of the naturalization examination regarding the
students who passed as described in subdivision (2).
(c) Not more than thirty (30) days after the department reports to the
general assembly the information under subsection (b), the department
shall post the pass rate under subsection (b)(3) on the department's
website.
SECTION 2. IC 20-30-5-7.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.2. A charter school and a state accredited nonpublic
elementary school shall include in the charter school's and state
accredited nonpublic elementary school's curriculum the following
language arts studies:
(1) For an elementary school:
(A) print handwriting; and
(B) cursive handwriting.
(2) For kindergarten through grade 6, spelling.
2026 IN 58—LS 6163/DI 110